Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 5. Unlawful Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For disciplinary guidelines, see 12 AAC 44, art. 7.

Sec. 08.68.340.
Prohibited conduct.

It is a class B misdemeanor for a person to

practice nursing under a diploma, license, or record that is unlawfully obtained, signed, or issued;

practice or offer to practice nursing without a license, unless the person is practicing within the scope of a delegation properly made under AS

08.68.805

or is giving necessary aid to the ill, injured, or infirm in an emergency;

employ as a nurse a person who is not licensed to practice nursing;

use in connection with the person’s name a designation that implies that the person is a licensed nurse unless the person is licensed;

practice nursing during the time that the person’s license is suspended or revoked;

practice nursing with knowledge that the person’s license has lapsed;

conduct a nursing education program and represent or imply that it is accredited by the board, unless the program has been accredited by the board.

It is a class A misdemeanor for a person to knowingly or intentionally do any of the acts described in (a)(1) — (5) and (7) of this section.

It is a violation for a person to practice nursing during the time that the person’s license has lapsed if the person does not know that the license has lapsed.

History.

(§§ 1, 22 ch 90 SLA 1957; am § 9 ch 129 SLA 1974; am § 23 ch 14 SLA 1982; am § 5 ch 97 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, in (a)(2), “AS

08.68.805

” was substituted for “AS

08.68.405

” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS

08.68.405

.

Cross references. —

For sentences for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Collateral references. —

Practicing medicine, surgery, dentistry, optometry, podiatry, or other healing arts without license as a separate or continuing offense, 99 ALR2d 654.

Sec. 08.68.350.
Punishment for misdemeanor. [Repealed, § 29 ch 14 SLA 1982.]

Sec. 08.68.360.
Unlicensed practice a public nuisance.

The practice of registered, advanced practice registered, or practical nursing for compensation by a person who is not licensed, or whose license is suspended, or revoked, or expired, is declared to be inimical to the public welfare and to constitute a public nuisance.

History.

(art VIII ch 90 SLA 1957; am § 17 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, substituted “registered, advanced practice registered,” for “professional”.

Sec. 08.68.370.
Application for injunction.

The board may apply for an injunction in a competent court to enjoin a person not licensed or whose license is suspended or revoked or expired from practicing registered, advanced practice registered, or practical nursing. The court may issue a temporary injunction enjoining the defendant from practicing registered, advanced practice registered, or practical nursing.

History.

(art VIII ch 90 SLA 1957; am § 18 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, substituted “registered, advanced practice registered,” for “professional” in two placed, both following “practicing”.

Sec. 08.68.380.
Issuance of injunction.

If it is established that the defendant has been or is practicing registered, advanced practice registered, or practical nursing without a license or has been or is practicing nursing after the defendant’s license has been suspended or revoked, or has expired, the court may enjoin the defendant from further practice.

History.

(art VIII ch 90 SLA 1957; am § 19 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, substituted “registered, advanced practice registered,” for “professional” preceding “or practical nursing”.

Sec. 08.68.390.
Remedy not exclusive.

If a person violates an injunction issued under this section, the person may be punished for contempt of court.
The injunction proceeding is in addition to other penalties and remedies provided in this chapter.

History.

(art VIII ch 90 SLA 1957)

Sec. 08.68.395.
[Renumbered as AS 08.68.700.]

Sec. 08.68.400.
[Renumbered as AS 08.68.800.]

Sec. 08.68.405.
[Renumbered as AS 08.68.805.]

Sec. 08.68.410.
[Renumbered as AS 08.68.850.]